Missouri, session 2026, SB904.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
1 Section A. Section 195.010, RSMo, is repealed and four
2 new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections
3 195.010, 195.800, 195.819, and 195.900, to read as follows:
1 195.010. The following words and phrases as used in
2 this chapter and chapter 579, unless the context otherwise
3 requires, mean:
4 (1) "Acute pain", pain, whether resulting from
5 disease, accidental or intentional trauma, or other causes,
6 that the practitioner reasonably expects to last only a
7 short period of time. Acute pain shall not include chronic
8 pain, pain being treated as part of cancer care, hospice or
9 other end-of-life care, or medication-assisted treatment for
10 substance use disorders;
11 (2) "Addict", a person who habitually uses one or more
12 controlled substances to such an extent as to create a
13 tolerance for such drugs, and who does not have a medical
14 need for such drugs, or who is so far addicted to the use of
15 such drugs as to have lost the power of self-control with
16 reference to his or her addiction;
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 904 2
17 (3) "Administer", to apply a controlled substance,
18 whether by injection, inhalation, ingestion, or any other
19 means, directly to the body of a patient or research subject
20 by:
21 (a) A practitioner (or, in his or her presence, by his
22 or her authorized agent); or
23 (b) The patient or research subject at the direction
24 and in the presence of the practitioner;
25 (4) "Agent", an authorized person who acts on behalf
26 of or at the direction of a manufacturer, distributor, or
27 dispenser. The term does not include a common or contract
28 carrier, public warehouseman, or employee of the carrier or
29 warehouseman while acting in the usual and lawful course of
30 the carrier's or warehouseman's business;
31 (5) "Attorney for the state", any prosecuting
32 attorney, circuit attorney, or attorney general authorized
33 to investigate, commence and prosecute an action under this
34 chapter;
35 (6) "Controlled substance", a drug, substance, or
36 immediate precursor in Schedules I through V listed in this
37 chapter;
38 (7) "Controlled substance analogue", a substance the
39 chemical structure of which is substantially similar to the
40 chemical structure of a controlled substance in Schedule I
41 or II and:
42 (a) Which has a stimulant, depressant, or
43 hallucinogenic effect on the central nervous system
44 substantially similar to the stimulant, depressant, or
45 hallucinogenic effect on the central nervous system of a
46 controlled substance included in Schedule I or II; or
47 (b) With respect to a particular individual, which
48 that individual represents or intends to have a stimulant,

SB 904 3
49 depressant, or hallucinogenic effect on the central nervous
50 system substantially similar to the stimulant, depressant,
51 or hallucinogenic effect on the central nervous system of a
52 controlled substance included in Schedule I or II. The term
53 does not include a controlled substance; any substance for
54 which there is an approved new drug application; any
55 substance for which an exemption is in effect for
56 investigational use, for a particular person, under Section
57 505 of the federal Food, Drug and Cosmetic Act (21 U.S.C.
58 Section 355) to the extent conduct with respect to the
59 substance is pursuant to the exemption; or any substance to
60 the extent not intended for human consumption before such an
61 exemption takes effect with respect to the substance;
62 (8) "Counterfeit substance", a controlled substance
63 which, or the container or labeling of which, without
64 authorization, bears the trademark, trade name, or other
65 identifying mark, imprint, number or device, or any likeness
66 thereof, of a manufacturer, distributor, or dispenser other
67 than the person who in fact manufactured, distributed, or
68 dispensed the substance;
69 (9) "Deliver" or "delivery", the actual, constructive,
70 or attempted transfer from one person to another of drug
71 paraphernalia or of a controlled substance, or an imitation
72 controlled substance, whether or not there is an agency
73 relationship, and includes a sale;
74 (10) "Dentist", a person authorized by law to practice
75 dentistry in this state;
76 (11) "Depressant or stimulant substance":
77 (a) A drug containing any quantity of barbituric acid
78 or any of the salts of barbituric acid or any derivative of
79 barbituric acid which has been designated by the United

SB 904 4
80 States Secretary of Health and Human Services as habit
81 forming under 21 U.S.C. Section 352(d);
82 (b) A drug containing any quantity of:
83 a. Amphetamine or any of its isomers;
84 b. Any salt of amphetamine or any salt of an isomer of
85 amphetamine; or
86 c. Any substance the United States Attorney General,
87 after investigation, has found to be, and by regulation
88 designated as, habit forming because of its stimulant effect
89 on the central nervous system;
90 (c) Lysergic acid diethylamide; or
91 (d) Any drug containing any quantity of a substance
92 that the United States Attorney General, after
93 investigation, has found to have, and by regulation
94 designated as having, a potential for abuse because of its
95 depressant or stimulant effect on the central nervous system
96 or its hallucinogenic effect;
97 (12) "Dispense", to deliver a narcotic or controlled
98 dangerous drug to an ultimate user or research subject by or
99 pursuant to the lawful order of a practitioner including the
100 prescribing, administering, packaging, labeling, or
101 compounding necessary to prepare the substance for such
102 delivery. "Dispenser" means a practitioner who dispenses;
103 (13) "Distribute", to deliver other than by
104 administering or dispensing a controlled substance;
105 (14) "Distributor", a person who distributes;
106 (15) "Drug":
107 (a) Substances recognized as drugs in the official
108 United States Pharmacopoeia, Official Homeopathic
109 Pharmacopoeia of the United States, or Official National
110 Formulary, or any supplement to any of them;

SB 904 5
111 (b) Substances intended for use in the diagnosis,
112 cure, mitigation, treatment or prevention of disease in
113 humans or animals;
114 (c) Substances, other than food, intended to affect
115 the structure or any function of the body of humans or
116 animals; and
117 (d) Substances intended for use as a component of any
118 article specified in this subdivision. It does not include
119 devices or their components, parts or accessories;
120 (16) "Drug-dependent person", a person who is using a
121 controlled substance and who is in a state of psychic or
122 physical dependence, or both, arising from the use of such
123 substance on a continuous basis. Drug dependence is
124 characterized by behavioral and other responses which
125 include a strong compulsion to take the substance on a
126 continuous basis in order to experience its psychic effects
127 or to avoid the discomfort caused by its absence;
128 (17) "Drug enforcement agency", the Drug Enforcement
129 Administration in the United States Department of Justice,
130 or its successor agency;
131 (18) "Drug paraphernalia", all equipment, products,
132 substances and materials of any kind which are used,
133 intended for use, or designed for use, in planting,
134 propagating, cultivating, growing, harvesting,
135 manufacturing, compounding, converting, producing,
136 processing, preparing, storing, containing, concealing,
137 injecting, ingesting, inhaling, or otherwise introducing
138 into the human body a controlled substance or an imitation
139 controlled substance in violation of this chapter or chapter
140 579. It includes, but is not limited to:
141 (a) Kits used, intended for use, or designed for use
142 in planting, propagating, cultivating, growing or harvesting

SB 904 6
143 of any species of plant which is a controlled substance or
144 from which a controlled substance can be derived;
145 (b) Kits used, intended for use, or designed for use
146 in manufacturing, compounding, converting, producing,
147 processing, or preparing controlled substances or imitation
148 controlled substances;
149 (c) Isomerization devices used, intended for use, or
150 designed for use in increasing the potency of any species of
151 plant which is a controlled substance or an imitation
152 controlled substance;
153 (d) Testing equipment used, intended for use, or
154 designed for use in identifying, or in analyzing the
155 strength, effectiveness or purity of controlled substances
156 or imitation controlled substances;
157 (e) Scales and balances used, intended for use, or
158 designed for use in weighing or measuring controlled
159 substances or imitation controlled substances;
160 (f) Dilutents and adulterants, such as quinine
161 hydrochloride, mannitol, mannite, dextrose and lactose,
162 used, intended for use, or designed for use in cutting
163 controlled substances or imitation controlled substances;
164 (g) Separation gins and sifters used, intended for
165 use, or designed for use in removing twigs and seeds from,
166 or in otherwise cleaning or refining, marijuana;
167 (h) Blenders, bowls, containers, spoons and mixing
168 devices used, intended for use, or designed for use in
169 compounding controlled substances or imitation controlled
170 substances;
171 (i) Capsules, balloons, envelopes and other containers
172 used, intended for use, or designed for use in packaging
173 small quantities of controlled substances or imitation
174 controlled substances;

SB 904 7
175 (j) Containers and other objects used, intended for
176 use, or designed for use in storing or concealing controlled
177 substances or imitation controlled substances;
178 (k) Hypodermic syringes, needles and other objects
179 used, intended for use, or designed for use in parenterally
180 injecting controlled substances or imitation controlled
181 substances into the human body;
182 (l) Objects used, intended for use, or designed for
183 use in ingesting, inhaling, or otherwise introducing
184 marijuana, cocaine, hashish, or hashish oil into the human
185 body, such as:
186 a. Metal, wooden, acrylic, glass, stone, plastic, or
187 ceramic pipes with or without screens, permanent screens,
188 hashish heads, or punctured metal bowls;
189 b. Water pipes;
190 c. Carburetion tubes and devices;
191 d. Smoking and carburetion masks;
192 e. Roach clips meaning objects used to hold burning
193 material, such as a marijuana cigarette, that has become too
194 small or too short to be held in the hand;
195 f. Miniature cocaine spoons and cocaine vials;
196 g. Chamber pipes;
197 h. Carburetor pipes;
198 i. Electric pipes;
199 j. Air-driven pipes;
200 k. Chillums;
201 l. Bongs;
202 m. Ice pipes or chillers;
203 (m) Substances used, intended for use, or designed for
204 use in the manufacture of a controlled substance.

SB 904 8
205 In determining whether an object, product, substance or
206 material is drug paraphernalia, a court or other authority
207 should consider, in addition to all other logically relevant
208 factors, the following:
209 a. Statements by an owner or by anyone in control of
210 the object concerning its use;
211 b. Prior convictions, if any, of an owner, or of
212 anyone in control of the object, under any state or federal
213 law relating to any controlled substance or imitation
214 controlled substance;
215 c. The proximity of the object, in time and space, to
216 a direct violation of this chapter or chapter 579;
217 d. The proximity of the object to controlled
218 substances or imitation controlled substances;
219 e. The existence of any residue of controlled
220 substances or imitation controlled substances on the object;
221 f. Direct or circumstantial evidence of the intent of
222 an owner, or of anyone in control of the object, to deliver
223 it to persons who he or she knows, or should reasonably
224 know, intend to use the object to facilitate a violation of
225 this chapter or chapter 579; the innocence of an owner, or
226 of anyone in control of the object, as to direct violation
227 of this chapter or chapter 579 shall not prevent a finding
228 that the object is intended for use, or designed for use as
229 drug paraphernalia;
230 g. Instructions, oral or written, provided with the
231 object concerning its use;
232 h. Descriptive materials accompanying the object which
233 explain or depict its use;
234 i. National or local advertising concerning its use;
235 j. The manner in which the object is displayed for
236 sale;

SB 904 9
237 k. Whether the owner, or anyone in control of the
238 object, is a legitimate supplier of like or related items to
239 the community, such as a licensed distributor or dealer of
240 tobacco products;
241 l. Direct or circumstantial evidence of the ratio of
242 sales of the object to the total sales of the business
243 enterprise;
244 m. The existence and scope of legitimate uses for the
245 object in the community;
246 n. Expert testimony concerning its use;
247 o. The quantity, form or packaging of the product,
248 substance or material in relation to the quantity, form or
249 packaging associated with any legitimate use for the
250 product, substance or material;
251 (19) "Federal narcotic laws", the laws of the United
252 States relating to controlled substances;
253 (20) "Hospital", a place devoted primarily to the
254 maintenance and operation of facilities for the diagnosis,
255 treatment or care, for not less than twenty-four hours in
256 any week, of three or more nonrelated individuals suffering
257 from illness, disease, injury, deformity or other abnormal
258 physical conditions; or a place devoted primarily to
259 provide, for not less than twenty-four consecutive hours in
260 any week, medical or nursing care for three or more
261 nonrelated individuals. The term hospital does not include
262 convalescent, nursing, shelter or boarding homes as defined
263 in chapter 198;
264 (21) "Illegal industrial hemp":
265 (a) All nonseed parts and varieties of the Cannabis
266 sativa L. plant, growing or not, that contain an average
267 delta-9 tetrahydrocannabinol (THC) concentration exceeding
268 three-tenths of one percent on a dry weight basis;

SB 904 10
269 (b) Illegal industrial hemp shall be destroyed in the
270 most effective manner possible, and such destruction shall
271 be verified by the Missouri state highway patrol;
272 (22) "Immediate precursor", a substance which:
273 (a) The state department of health and senior services
274 has found to be and by rule designates as being the
275 principal compound commonly used or produced primarily for
276 use in the manufacture of a controlled substance;
277 (b) Is an immediate chemical intermediary used or
278 likely to be used in the manufacture of a controlled
279 substance; and
280 (c) The control of which is necessary to prevent,
281 curtail or limit the manufacture of the controlled substance;
282 (23) "Imitation controlled substance", a substance
283 that is not a controlled substance, which by dosage unit
284 appearance (including color, shape, size and markings), or
285 by representations made, would lead a reasonable person to
286 believe that the substance is a controlled substance. In
287 determining whether the substance is an imitation controlled
288 substance the court or authority concerned should consider,
289 in addition to all other logically relevant factors, the
290 following:
291 (a) Whether the substance was approved by the federal
292 Food and Drug Administration for over-the-counter
293 (nonprescription or nonlegend) sales and was sold in the
294 federal Food and Drug Administration-approved package, with
295 the federal Food and Drug Administration-approved labeling
296 information;
297 (b) Statements made by an owner or by anyone else in
298 control of the substance concerning the nature of the
299 substance, or its use or effect;

SB 904 11
300 (c) Whether the substance is packaged in a manner
301 normally used for illicit controlled substances;
302 (d) Prior convictions, if any, of an owner, or anyone
303 in control of the object, under state or federal law related
304 to controlled substances or fraud;
305 (e) The proximity of the substances to controlled
306 substances;
307 (f) Whether the consideration tendered in exchange for
308 the noncontrolled substance substantially exceeds the
309 reasonable value of the substance considering the actual
310 chemical composition of the substance and, where applicable,
311 the price at which over-the-counter substances of like
312 chemical composition sell. An imitation controlled
313 substance does not include a placebo or registered
314 investigational drug either of which was manufactured,
315 distributed, possessed or delivered in the ordinary course
316 of professional practice or research;
317 (24) "Industrial hemp"[:
318 (a) All nonseed parts and varieties of the Cannabis
319 sativa L. plant, growing or not, that contain an average
320 delta-9 tetrahydrocannabinol (THC) concentration that does
321 not exceed three-tenths of one percent on a dry weight basis
322 or the maximum concentration allowed under federal law,
323 whichever is greater;
324 (b) Any Cannabis sativa L. seed that is part of a
325 growing crop, retained by a grower for future planting, or
326 used for processing into or use as agricultural hemp seed;
327 (c) Industrial hemp includes industrial hemp
328 commodities and products and topical or ingestible animal
329 and consumer products derived from industrial hemp with a
330 delta-9 tetrahydrocannabinol concentration of not more than

SB 904 12
331 three-tenths of one percent on a dry weight basis], the same
332 meaning as in section 195.900;
333 (25) "Initial prescription", a prescription issued to
334 a patient who has never previously been issued a
335 prescription for the drug or its pharmaceutical equivalent
336 or who was previously issued a prescription for the drug or
337 its pharmaceutical equivalent, but the date on which the
338 current prescription is being issued is more than five
339 months after the date the patient last used or was
340 administered the drug or its equivalent;
341 (26) "Laboratory", a laboratory approved by the
342 department of health and senior services as proper to be
343 entrusted with the custody of controlled substances but does
344 not include a pharmacist who compounds controlled substances
345 to be sold or dispensed on prescriptions;
346 (27) "Manufacture", the production, preparation,
347 propagation, compounding or processing of drug paraphernalia
348 or of a controlled substance, or an imitation controlled
349 substance, either directly or by extraction from substances
350 of natural origin, or independently by means of chemical
351 synthesis, or by a combination of extraction and chemical
352 synthesis, and includes any packaging or repackaging of the
353 substance or labeling or relabeling of its container. This
354 term does not include the preparation or compounding of a
355 controlled substance or an imitation controlled substance or
356 the preparation, compounding, packaging or labeling of a
357 narcotic or dangerous drug:
358 (a) By a practitioner as an incident to his or her
359 administering or dispensing of a controlled substance or an
360 imitation controlled substance in the course of his or her
361 professional practice; or

SB 904 13
362 (b) By a practitioner or his or her authorized agent
363 under his or her supervision, for the purpose of, or as an
364 incident to, research, teaching or chemical analysis and not
365 for sale;
366 (28) "Marijuana", all parts of the plant genus
367 Cannabis in any species or form thereof, including, but not
368 limited to Cannabis Sativa L., except industrial hemp,
369 Cannabis Indica, Cannabis Americana, Cannabis Ruderalis, and
370 Cannabis Gigantea, whether growing or not, the seeds
371 thereof, the resin extracted from any part of the plant; and
372 every compound, manufacture, salt, derivative, mixture, or
373 preparation of the plant, its seeds or resin. It does not
374 include the mature stalks of the plant, fiber produced from
375 the stalks, oil or cake made from the seeds of the plant,
376 any other compound, manufacture, salt, derivative, mixture
377 or preparation of the mature stalks (except the resin
378 extracted therefrom), fiber, oil or cake, or the sterilized
379 seed of the plant which is incapable of germination;
380 (29) "Methamphetamine precursor drug", any drug
381 containing ephedrine, pseudoephedrine, phenylpropanolamine,
382 or any of their salts, optical isomers, or salts of optical
383 isomers;
384 (30) "Narcotic drug", any of the following, whether
385 produced directly or indirectly by extraction from
386 substances of vegetable origin, or independently by means of
387 chemical synthesis, or by a combination of extraction and
388 chemical analysis:
389 (a) Opium, opiate, and any derivative, of opium or
390 opiate, including their isomers, esters, ethers, salts, and
391 salts of isomers, esters, and ethers, whenever the existence
392 of the isomers, esters, ethers, and salts is possible within

SB 904 14
393 the specific chemical designation. The term does not
394 include the isoquinoline alkaloids of opium;
395 (b) Coca leaves, but not including extracts of coca
396 leaves from which cocaine, ecgonine, and derivatives of
397 ecgonine or their salts have been removed;
398 (c) Cocaine or any salt, isomer, or salt of isomer
399 thereof;
400 (d) Ecgonine, or any derivative, salt, isomer, or salt
401 of isomer thereof;
402 (e) Any compound, mixture, or preparation containing
403 any quantity of any substance referred to in paragraphs (a)
404 to (d) of this subdivision;
405 (31) "Official written order", an order written on a
406 form provided for that purpose by the United States
407 Commissioner of Narcotics, under any laws of the United
408 States making provision therefor, if such order forms are
409 authorized and required by federal law, and if no such order
410 form is provided, then on an official form provided for that
411 purpose by the department of health and senior services;
412 (32) "Opiate" or "opioid", any substance having an
413 addiction-forming or addiction-sustaining liability similar
414 to morphine or being capable of conversion into a drug
415 having addiction-forming or addiction-sustaining liability.
416 The term includes its racemic and levorotatory forms. It
417 does not include, unless specifically controlled under
418 section 195.017, the dextrorotatory isomer of 3-methoxy-n-
419 methyl-morphinan and its salts (dextromethorphan);
420 (33) "Opium poppy", the plant of the species Papaver
421 somniferum L., except its seeds;
422 (34) "Over-the-counter sale", a retail sale licensed
423 pursuant to chapter 144 of a drug other than a controlled
424 substance;

SB 904 15
425 (35) "Person", an individual, corporation, government
426 or governmental subdivision or agency, business trust,
427 estate, trust, partnership, joint venture, association, or
428 any other legal or commercial entity;
429 (36) "Pharmacist", a licensed pharmacist as defined by
430 the laws of this state, and where the context so requires,
431 the owner of a store or other place of business where
432 controlled substances are compounded or dispensed by a
433 licensed pharmacist; but nothing in this chapter shall be
434 construed as conferring on a person who is not registered
435 nor licensed as a pharmacist any authority, right or
436 privilege that is not granted to him by the pharmacy laws of
437 this state;
438 (37) "Poppy straw", all parts, except the seeds, of
439 the opium poppy, after mowing;
440 (38) "Possessed" or "possessing a controlled
441 substance", a person, with the knowledge of the presence and
442 nature of a substance, has actual or constructive possession
443 of the substance. A person has actual possession if he has
444 the substance on his or her person or within easy reach and
445 convenient control. A person who, although not in actual
446 possession, has the power and the intention at a given time
447 to exercise dominion or control over the substance either
448 directly or through another person or persons is in
449 constructive possession of it. Possession may also be sole
450 or joint. If one person alone has possession of a substance
451 possession is sole. If two or more persons share possession
452 of a substance, possession is joint;
453 (39) "Practitioner", a physician, dentist,
454 optometrist, podiatrist, veterinarian, scientific
455 investigator, pharmacy, hospital or other person licensed,
456 registered or otherwise permitted by this state to

SB 904 16
457 distribute, dispense, conduct research with respect to or
458 administer or to use in teaching or chemical analysis, a
459 controlled substance in the course of professional practice
460 or research in this state, or a pharmacy, hospital or other
461 institution licensed, registered, or otherwise permitted to
462 distribute, dispense, conduct research with respect to or
463 administer a controlled substance in the course of
464 professional practice or research;
465 (40) "Production", includes the manufacture, planting,
466 cultivation, growing, or harvesting of drug paraphernalia or
467 of a controlled substance or an imitation controlled
468 substance;
469 (41) "Registry number", the number assigned to each
470 person registered under the federal controlled substances
471 laws;
472 (42) "Sale", includes barter, exchange, or gift, or
473 offer therefor, and each such transaction made by any
474 person, whether as principal, proprietor, agent, servant or
475 employee;
476 (43) "State" when applied to a part of the United
477 States, includes any state, district, commonwealth,
478 territory, insular possession thereof, and any area subject
479 to the legal authority of the United States of America;
480 (44) "Synthetic cannabinoid", includes unless
481 specifically excepted or unless listed in another schedule,
482 any natural or synthetic material, compound, mixture, or
483 preparation that contains any quantity of a substance that
484 is a cannabinoid receptor agonist, including but not limited
485 to any substance listed in paragraph (ll) of subdivision (4)
486 of subsection 2 of section 195.017 and any analogues;
487 homologues; isomers, whether optical, positional, or
488 geometric; esters; ethers; salts; and salts of isomers,

SB 904 17
489 esters, and ethers, whenever the existence of the isomers,
490 esters, ethers, or salts is possible within the specific
491 chemical designation, however, it shall not include any
492 approved pharmaceutical authorized by the United States Food
493 and Drug Administration;
494 (45) "Ultimate user", a person who lawfully possesses
495 a controlled substance or an imitation controlled substance
496 for his or her own use or for the use of a member of his or
497 her household or immediate family, regardless of whether
498 they live in the same household, or for administering to an
499 animal owned by him or by a member of his or her household.
500 For purposes of this section, the phrase "immediate family"
501 means a husband, wife, parent, child, sibling, stepparent,
502 stepchild, stepbrother, stepsister, grandparent, or
503 grandchild;
504 (46) "Wholesaler", a person who supplies drug
505 paraphernalia or controlled substances or imitation
506 controlled substances that he himself has not produced or
507 prepared, on official written orders, but not on
508 prescriptions.
1 195.800. 1. Notwithstanding any other provision of
2 law to the contrary, no state agency, including employees
3 therein, shall disclose to the federal government, any
4 federal government employee, or any unauthorized third party
5 the statewide list or any individual information of persons
6 who have applied for or obtained a qualifying patient
7 identification card, a qualifying patient cultivation
8 identification card, or a primary caregiver identification
9 card, as those cards are described in Article XIV, Section 1
10 of the Constitution of Missouri relating to the right to
11 access medical marijuana, unless required to do so pursuant

SB 904 18
12 to a subpoena or court order issued by a court of competent
13 jurisdiction.
14 2. Any person who knowingly violates the provisions of
15 this section shall be guilty of a class E felony.
1 195.819. Upon the written request of a consumer,
2 marijuana dispensary facilities, as described in Article XIV
3 of the Constitution of Missouri, shall not create or retain
4 any record containing the consumer's identifying
5 information. The provisions of this section shall not apply
6 to any record-keeping requirements relating to qualifying
7 patients and primary caregivers under Article XIV, Section 1
8 of the Constitution of Missouri. Any dispensary facility
9 that violates the provisions of this section shall be
10 assessed a fine of two thousand five hundred dollars per
11 occurrence.
1 195.900. 1. This section shall be known and may be
2 cited as the "Intoxicating Cannabinoid Control Act".
3 2. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
4 (1) "CBD", cannabidiol, a nonintoxicating cannabinoid
5 found in cannabis and hemp;
6 (2) "Cannabinoids", ligands that are either plant-
7 derived, synthetic, or semisynthetic, and have an affinity
8 for and activity at cannabinoid receptors;
9 (3) "Container", the innermost wrapping, packaging, or
10 vessel in direct contact with a final hemp-derived
11 cannabinoid product in which the final hemp-derived
12 cannabinoid product is enclosed for retail sale to
13 consumers, including, but not limited to, a jar, bottle,
14 bag, box, packet, can, carton, or cartridge. "Container"
15 shall not include bulk shipping containers or outer
16 wrappings that are not essential for the final retail

SB 904 19
17 delivery or sale to an end-user consumer for personal or
18 household use;
19 (4) "Department", the department of health and senior
20 services;
21 (5) "Hemp", the plant Cannabis sativa L. and any part
22 of that plant, including the seeds thereof, and all
23 derivatives, extracts, cannabinoids, isomers, acids, salts,
24 and salts of isomers, whether growing or not, with a total
25 tetrahydrocannabinols concentration, including
26 tetrahydrocannabinolic acid, of not more than three-tenths
27 of one percent on a dry weight basis. "Hemp" shall include
28 industrial hemp, but shall not include the following:
29 (a) Any viable seed from a Cannabis sativa L. plant
30 that exceeds a total tetrahydrocannabinol concentration,
31 including tetrahydrocannabinolic acid, of three-tenths of
32 one percent on a dry weight basis;
33 (b) Any intermediate hemp-derived cannabinoid products
34 containing:
35 a. Cannabinoids that are capable of being naturally
36 produced by a Cannabis sativa L. plant and were synthesized
37 or manufactured outside the plant; or
38 b. More than three-tenths of one percent on a dry
39 weight basis of a combined total of tetrahydrocannabinols,
40 including tetrahydrocannabinolic acid, and any other
41 cannabinoids that have similar effects or are marketed as
42 having similar effects on humans or animals as a
43 tetrahydrocannabinol, as determined by the U.S. Secretary of
44 Health and Human Services;
45 (c) Any intermediate hemp-derived cannabinoid products
46 marketed or sold as a final product or directly to an end
47 consumer for personal or household use; or

SB 904 20
48 (d) Any final hemp-derived cannabinoid products
49 containing:
50 a. Cannabinoids that are not capable of being produced
51 by a Cannabis sativa L. plant;
52 b. Cannabinoids that are capable of being naturally
53 produced by a Cannabis sativa L. plant and that were
54 synthesized or manufactured outside the plant; or
55 c. Greater that four tenths of one milligram combined
56 total per container of tetrahydrocannabinols, including
57 tetrahydrocannabinolic acid, and any other cannabinoids that
58 have similar effects or are marketed as having similar
59 effects on humans or animals as a tetrahydrocannabinol, as
60 determined by the U.S. Secretary of Health and Human
61 Services;
62 (6) "Hemp-derived cannabinoid product", any
63 intermediate or final product derived from hemp, other than
64 industrial hemp, that contains cannabinoids in any form and
65 is intended for human or animal use through any means of
66 application or administration, including, but not limited
67 to, inhalation, ingestion, or topical application. "Hemp-
68 derived cannabinoid product" shall not include a drug that
69 is the subject of an application approved under subsection
70 (c) or (j) of Section 505 of the Federal Food, Drug, and
71 Cosmetic Act, 21 U.S.C. Section 355, as amended;
72 (7) "Industrial hemp", hemp that is:
73 (a) Grown for the use of the stalk of the plant, fiber
74 produced from such a stalk, or any other noncannabinoid
75 compound, derivative, mixture, preparation, or manufacture
76 of such a stalk;
77 (b) Grown for the use of the whole grain, oil, cake,
78 nut, hull, or any other noncannabinoid compound, derivative,

SB 904 21
79 mixture, preparation, or manufacture of the seeds of such
80 plant;
81 (c) Grown for the purpose of producing microgreens or
82 other edible hemp leaf products intended for human
83 consumption that are derived from an immature hemp plant
84 that is grown from seeds that do not exceed the threshold
85 for total tetrahydrocannabinol concentration under paragraph
86 (a) of subdivision (5) of this subsection;
87 (d) A plant that does not enter the stream of commerce
88 and is intended to support hemp research at an institution
89 of higher education, as defined in Section 101 of the Higher
90 Education Act of 1965, 20 U.S.C. Section 1001, as amended,
91 or an independent research institute; or
92 (e) Grown for the use of a viable seed of the plant
93 produced solely for the production or manufacture of any
94 material described in paragraphs (a) to (d) of this
95 subdivision;
96 (8) "Intermediate hemp-derived cannabinoid product", a
97 hemp-derived cannabinoid product that is:
98 (a) Not yet in the final form or preparation marketed
99 or intended to be used or consumed by a human or animal; or
100 (b) A powder, liquid, tablet, oil, or other product
101 form that is intended or marketed to be mixed, dissolved,
102 formulated, or otherwise added to or prepared with or into
103 any other substance prior to administration or consumption;
104 (9) "Marijuana", as such term is defined in Article
105 XIV, Constitution of Missouri and shall not be construed to
106 conform to or be included in the definition of "hemp" in
107 this section;
108 (10) "Transaction", the sale of a single unit of a
109 hemp-derived cannabinoid product, including a single unit in
110 a multiunit package.

SB 904 22
111 3. The general assembly hereby declares that the state
112 has a compelling interest in ensuring that all hemp-derived
113 cannabinoid products be subject to growing, manufacturing,
114 dispensing, transportation, advertising, marketing, testing,
115 packaging, and labeling requirements in a manner no less
116 stringent than the regulatory requirements imposed upon
117 licensees under Article XIV of the Constitution of Missouri
118 and regulations promulgated by the department.
119 4. The cultivation, production, manufacturing,
120 testing, transportation, and retail sale of all hemp-derived
121 cannabinoid products within this state shall be conducted
122 solely by entities licensed by the department under Article
123 XIV, Constitution of Missouri. Hemp-derived cannabinoid
124 products shall be considered marijuana and shall be subject
125 to the legal framework contained in Article XIV,
126 Constitution of Missouri, under which the purchase,
127 possession, consumption, use, delivery, manufacturing, and
128 sale of marijuana is regulated by the department.
129 5. Hemp and industrial hemp shall not be considered
130 marijuana and shall not be subject to the legal framework
131 contained in Article XIV, Constitution of Missouri or in
132 this section. Nothing in this section shall be construed to
133 regulate hemp, industrial hemp, or products that do not fall
134 within the definition of hemp-derived cannabinoid products,
135 and the provisions of this section shall not be construed to
136 conflict or otherwise preempt the Agriculture Improvement
137 Act of 2018, Pub. L. 115-334, as amended.
138 6. Nothing in this section shall be construed to
139 prohibit the interstate commerce of hemp or the
140 transportation or shipment of hemp through this state.
141 7. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the
142 contrary, all hemp-derived cannabinoid products are

SB 904 23
143 marijuana and shall be subject to the jurisdiction of the
144 department and the office of the attorney general consistent
145 with Article XIV, Constitution of Missouri and the
146 provisions of this section. The department and the office
147 of the attorney general shall be empowered, mandated, and
148 otherwise authorized to enforce the provisions of this
149 section in such a manner as to ensure that no hemp-derived
150 cannabinoid products are cultivated, manufactured, tested,
151 transported, or sold within this state outside of a licensed
152 comprehensive marijuana facility, medical marijuana
153 facility, testing facility, or microbusiness facility, as
154 such terms are defined in Article XIV, Constitution of
155 Missouri.
156 8. No person or entity engaged in the sale of products
157 that contain CBD, hemp, marijuana, cannabinoids, hemp-
158 derived cannabinoid products, or paraphernalia to aid in the
159 human or animal consumption of such products, other than a
160 comprehensive marijuana dispensary facility, medical
161 marijuana dispensary facility, or microbusiness dispensary
162 facility, as such terms are defined in Article XIV,
163 Constitution of Missouri, shall carry on, conduct, or
164 transact business under a name that contains as part of the
165 name the word "dispensary" or any word of similar import.
166 9. (1) The office of the attorney general, the
167 department, the department of public safety, the division of
168 alcohol and tobacco control within the department of public
169 safety, the state highway patrol, and any other state agency
170 deemed necessary by the office of the attorney general to
171 aid in the enforcement of this section shall concurrently be
172 authorized, empowered, and mandated to enforce the
173 provisions of this section, including, but not limited to,
174 the prohibition of the cultivation, manufacturing, testing,

SB 904 24
175 transportation, and retail sale of hemp-derived cannabinoid
176 products outside of licensed comprehensive marijuana
177 facilities, medical marijuana facilities, or microbusiness
178 facilities, as such terms are defined in Article XIV,
179 Constitution of Missouri.
180 (2) The office of the attorney general shall have
181 primary jurisdiction to enforce the provisions of this
182 section, including, but not limited to:
183 (a) Utilizing a multijurisdictional enforcement
184 approach, including, but not limited to, direct coordination
185 with the department, the department of public safety, the
186 division of alcohol and tobacco control within the
187 department of public safety, the state highway patrol,
188 prosecuting and circuit attorneys, and any other state
189 agency deemed necessary by the office of the attorney
190 general;
191 (b) Collaborate and coordinate with local county and
192 municipal governments and other political subdivisions; and
193 (c) Utilize the department's reference laboratory.
194 10. Any person or entity that violates the provisions
195 of this section shall be subject to a fine of five thousand
196 dollars per transaction, and shall be guilty of a class D
197 felony.
198 11. The department of health and senior services shall
199 promulgate all rules and regulations necessary to implement
200 the provisions of this section. Any rule or portion of a
201 rule, as that term is defined in section 536.010, that is
202 created under the authority delegated in this section shall
203 become effective only if it complies with and is subject to
204 all of the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable,
205 section 536.028. This section and chapter 536 are
206 nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with the

SB 904 25
207 general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay
208 the effective date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are
209 subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant of
210 rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or adopted after
211 August 28, 2026, shall be invalid and void.
1 Section B. Because of the immediate danger to the
2 health and safety of Missouri residents presented by the
3 rapid increase of unregulated, untested, and otherwise
4 dangerous intoxicating cannabinoid products in this state,
5 the enactment of section 195.900 of this act is deemed
6 necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
7 health, welfare, peace, and safety, and is hereby declared
8 to be an emergency act within the meaning of the
9 constitution, and the enactment of section 195.900 of this
10 act shall be in full force and effect upon its passage and
11 approval.
✓